Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.160

Tax title property—Disposition of proceeds upon resale.

Whenever property struck off to or bid in by a county at a sale for general taxes is subsequently sold by the county, the proceeds of the sale must be applied as follows:

(1) First, to reimburse the county for the costs of foreclosure and sale as defined in RCW 36.35.110;

(2) Any remaining proceeds must next be applied to pay any amounts deferred under chapter 84.37 or 84.38 RCW on the property, including accrued interest, and outstanding at the time the county acquired the property by tax deed;

(3) Any remaining proceeds must next be applied to discharge in full the lien or liens for general taxes for which the property was sold;

(4) Any remaining proceeds must be paid to the city or town to discharge all local improvement assessment liens against the property; and

(5) Any surplus proceeds must be distributed among the proper county funds.

[ 2013 c 221 s 1; 1965 c 7 s 35.49.160. Prior: 1929 c 143 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 170 s 1, part; 1911 c 98 s 40, part; RRS s 9393, part.]